<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89519-0021 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.5-19-89.f2.A1020</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 96 / Friday, May 19, 1989 / Rulesand Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">50 CFR Parts 216, 229 and 611 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 81140-9106] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Taking of Marine Mammals Incidental to Commercial Fishing Operations;Interim Exemption for Commercial Fisheries </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>National Marine Fisheries Service (NOAA Fisheries), NOAA,Commerce.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Interim rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>NOAA Fisheries issues this interim rule to govern thetaking of marine mammals incidental to commercial fishing operations andrequests public comments. These regulations implement portions of the recentamendments to the Marine Mammal Protection Act of 1972 (MMPA) which providea 5-year exemption for certain incidental takings of marine mammals inthe course of commercial fishing. The intended effect of this rule is toestablish a program for exempting commercial fishermen from certain ofthe MMPA's prohibitions on taking. After considering public comments, NOAAFisheries will be issuing final regulations to replace this interim rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>The amendments to Parts 216 and 611 and andSection;andSection;229.5 and 229.6 of this interim rule become effective on May 19, 1989.The remaining sections in Part 229 become effective on July 21, 1989. Commentson this interim rule must be received by July 18, 1989. Registration forExemption Certificates under andSection; 229.5 will be accepted immediately.Part 229 expires on October 1, 1993.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Send comments to Dr. Nancy Foster, Director, Office ofProtected Resources, National Marine Fisheries Service, 1335 East WestHighway, Silver Spring, MD 20910.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Herbert W. Kaufman, Office ofProtected Resources, 301-427-2319; Steven Zimmerman, Alaska Region, NationalMarine Fisheries Service, P.O. Box 21668, Juneau, AK 99802, 907-586-7233;Brent Norberg, Northwest Region, National Marine Fisheries Service, 7600Sand Point Way NE, Seattle, WA 98115, 206-526-6110; James Lecky, SouthwestRegion, National Marine Fisheries Service, 300 S. Ferry Street, TerminalIsland, CA 90731-7415, 213-514-6664; Douglas Beach, Northeast Region, NationalMarine Fisheries Service, 1 Blackburn Drive, Gloucester, MA 01930, 508-281-9328;or, Charles Oravetz, Southeast Region, National Marine Fisheries Service,9450 Koger Blvd., St. Petersburg, FL 33702, 813-893-3366.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Background </ITAG>Before the 1988 amendments, the MMPA prohibited the take of marine mammalsincidental to commercial fishing operations unless authorized by a generalpermit or a small take exemption. In order to issue a general permit, NOAAFisheries was required to determine that the population stock from whicha marine mammal was to be taken was within its optimum sustainable population(OSP) and that the marine mammal stock would not be disadvantaged by theincidental take. If these determinations could not be made, a permit couldnot be issued for that particular marine mammal stock. Early in 1988 itbecame apparent that the necessary determinations to renew certain generalpermits could not be made and many fishermen would be forced to forgo fishingaltogether or risk substantial penalties for violating the MMPA. To addressthis problem, Congress amended the MMPA based on a proposal developed byrepresentatives of the fishing industry and the conservation community.Section 114, added by Pub. L. 100-711 on November 23, 1988, replaces mostearlier provisions of the MMPA for granting incidental take authorizationsto commercial fishermen with an interim exemption system valid until October1, 1993. Section 114 gives most commercial fishermen a 5-year exemptionfrom the incidental taking provisions of the MMPA, provided that certainconditions are met. The primary objective of this interim system is toprovide a means to obtain reliable information about interactions betweencommercial fishing activities and marine mammals while allowing commercialfishing operations to continue despite NOAA Fisheries' current inabilityto make OSP findings. The information collected in conjunction with theexemption system and information on the sizes and trends of marine mammalpopulations will be used to develop a long-term program to govern the takingof marine mammals associated with commercial fisheries. The Secretary ofCommerce is required to provide Congress a proposed system of authorizingincidental takes by January 1, 1992. The 1988 amendments retain the immediate goal of the MMPA to reduce theincidental kill or serious injury of marine mammals in the course of commercialfishing operations to insignificant levels approaching a zero mortalityand serious injury rate. As stated in Senate Report 100-592, Congress anticipatedthat progress toward this goal would be achieved through education programsand the development of improved fishing gear and techniques, and commendedthe commitment made by representatives of commercial fishing organizationsto undertake and fund a special research program on gear technology andfishing practices, and to educate and inform fishermen of their responsibilitiesunder the MMPA. The 1988 amendments require the Secretary of Commerce to publish a listof fisheries, along with the marine mammals and number of vessels or personsinvolved in each such fishery, in three categories as follows: (I) A frequent incidental taking of marine mammals; (II) An occasional incidental taking of marine mammals; or (III) A remote likelihood, or no known incidental taking, of marine mammals.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">NOAA Fisheries published an advance notice of proposed rulemakingand proposed List of Fisheries in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on January 27, 1989 (54 FR 4154). Comments wererequested by February 27, 1989. NOAA Fisheries issued a notice of finalList of Fisheries on April 20, 1989 (54 FR 16072). The List of Fisheries,categorized according to frequency of incidental take of marine mammals,will be reviewed at least annually and may be amended, after notice inthe <T4>Federal Register </T4>and opportunity for public comment. Based on Congressional guidance, NOAA Fisheries' interpretation of the1988 amendments, public comment and meetings and consultations with Stateand Federal agencies, Regional Fishery Management Councils, treaty Indiantribes, and other interested parties, NOAA Fisheries issues this interimrule under the authority of sections 112 and 114(k) of the MMPA to governexemptions on the taking of marine mammals incidental to commercial fishingoperations. The 1988 amendments require that, beginning July 21, 1989,vessel owners must be registered and have proof of an exemption in orderto engage lawfully in any Category I or II fishery. The 1988 amendmentsalso require that within 120 days of enactment of the amendments, the Secretarypublish in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>information to advise vessel owners on how toregister for an exemption and otherwise comply with the requirements ofsection 114 of the MMPA. There is not sufficient time to publish a proposedrule to establish a registration and exemption system, solicit public comment,and issue a final rule in time to notify fishermen of the rule and allowall affected fishing vessel owners an opportunity to register for and receivean exemption before July 21, 1989. Therefore, to accommodate the statutorydeadlines, NOAA Fisheries issues this interim rule and requests publiccomment. The registration and Exemption Certificate provisions establishedby andSection;andSection; 229.5 and 229.6 of this interim rule become effectiveimmediately; the prohibitions and other provisions become effective onJuly 21, 1989. Registration for Exemption Certificates may begin immediatelyin accordance with the instructions in this document. Based on commentsreceived, NOAA Fisheries will issue final regulations to replace this interimrule that may amend these requirements.NOAA Fisheries will also issue proposed regulations on the reporting requirementsassociated with the exemption system, and will request public comment.The reporting requirements will become effective upon publication of finalregulations on the reporting requirements in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. <ITAG tagnum="84">Comments and Responses </ITAG>Fifty-six comments were received in response to the January 27, 1989, advancenotice of proposed rulemaking and proposed List of Fisheries. Commentsand information were received from members of Congress, State and Federalagencies, treaty Indian tribes, fishing associations, fishermen, conservationgroups and other interested parties. Comments on the exemption system,observer program and related topics are summarized below along with NOAAFisheries' responses. These comments were considered in developing thisinterim rule. Comments on the criteria for categorizing fisheries and onthe List of Fisheries are summarized and discussed in the final List ofFisheries (April 20, 1989; 54 FR 16072). Comments on the reporting systemwill be discussed in the notice issuing NOAA Fisheries' proposed regulationsgoverning the reporting requirements. Comments on Exemption System 1. One commenter urged that an interim rule be issued to implement theexemption system, to define limitations on intentional taking, and to establishterms and conditions. Another commenter urged that the public be givenanother opportunity to comment on the proposed exemption system beforeit is final, and urged that NOAA Fisheries hold public hearings after thefirst year of implementation. Beginning July 21, 1989, fishermen must be registered to fish lawfullyin any Category I or II fishery. To give fishermen sufficient time to registerand to notify them of the requirements that will be in place, NOAA Fisheriesissues this interim rule and requests public comment. Based on public comment,a final rule will be issued that may amend these requirements. Public meetingsor public hearings will be conducted as necessary during the 5-year interimexemption. 2. Commenters believed that the exemption program should follow a conservativeapproach that favors the protection of marine mammals. Terms and conditionsshould be added to all exemptions to protect marine mammals, such as prohibitionson the disposal at sea of fishing gear that may entangle marine mammals.Section 114 gives fishermen a 5-year exemption from the incidental takingprovisions of the MMPA, provided certain conditions are met. The informationcollected in conjunction with the exemption system and information on thesizes and trends of marine mammal populations will be used to develop along-term program to govern the incidental taking of marine mammals associatedwith commercial fisheries. NOAA Fisheries will restrict fisheries duringthe 5-year exemption if it is determined necessary to prevent significantadverse impacts on marine mammal populations or to comply with other statutoryrequirements. (See ``Emergency and Special Regulations'' section below.)NOAA Fisheries also recognizes its duty to reduce the level of incidentalkill or serious injuries and has established reasonable terms and conditionsto Exemption Certificates to minimize impacts while allowing commercialfisheries to continue. This interim rule prohibits the willful discardof any fishing gear, in whole or in part, in Category I, II and III fisheries.3. Commenters believed that NOAA Fisheries should reaffirm its intent tomeet the immediate goal requirement of the amendments. NOAA Fisheries recognizes that identifying means of reducing the incidentaltake is important in developing a long-term program, and expects that thefishing industry will play a major role in developing improved fishinggear and techniques to reduce the incidental take of marine mammals. Asnoted above, NOAA Fisheries also recognizes its duties to consider requirementsto reduce serious injuries or kills incidental to commercial fishing operations.4. One commenter believed that, since the MMPA's definition of take wasnot changed, the definition of incidental take should not be restrictedto accidental takes by entanglement, serious injury or death. Another commenterbelieved that only injuries or mortalities should be considered a takeunder section 114 of the MMPA. The 1988 amendments to the MMPA did not change the definition of take orthe prohibitions on taking marine mammals. Take, as defined in section3 of the MMPA, means to harass, hunt, capture or kill, or attempt to harass,hunt, capture or kill any marine mammal. Incidental take is defined inthis interim rule to mean any accidental or intentional taking of a marinemammal in the course of commercial fishing operations. 5. One commenter believed that the exemption under the MMPA should applyto endangered and threatened marine mammals, regardless of whether or notthe takings were authorized under the Endangered Species Act of 1973 (ESA).The commenter believed that takings of endangered or threatened speciesnot authorized under the ESA should only be subject to penalties underthe ESA, rather than penalties under both the ESA and MMPA.In general, the MMPA exemptions will apply to the accidental taking ofendangered and threatened marine mammals (except southern sea otters).Restrictions on the MMPA exemptions may be made to reduce the incidentaltaking or to prohibit any taking of certain endangered and threatened species,if necessary to minimize adverse impacts to a population or to comply withother statutory requirements. However, endangered and threatened speciescontinue to be protected under the ESA. The MMPA exemption does not exemptfishermen from the prohibitions under the ESA on taking endangered andthreatened species. To be exempt from the taking prohibitions under theESA, additional taking authorization is needed. 6. One commenter recommended that fishermen be automatically registeredin 1989, since many fishermen will be impossible to reach because theywill already be fishing by July 21 when the exemption system is to be inplace. The first year should be used to familiarize fishermen with theexemption and reporting requirements. The 1988 amendments require that, beginning July 21, 1989, vessel ownersmust register with NOAA Fisheries and have proof of an exemption in orderto engage lawfully in any Category I or II fishery. Section 114 of theMMPA and andSection; 229.9 of this interim rule contain a provision thatunknowing violations will not be prosecuted during 1989. Congress addedthis exception to account for situations where, because a fisherman wasinvolved in a fishery before the appropriate exemption forms and decalswere available or because of the remote location of the fishery, the fishermanhad no way of knowing of the requirements or did not have the ability toobtain an exemption. 7. One commenter recommended that one exemption cover both Category I andII fisheries since many fishermen will engage in fisheries in both categoriesand since the only significant difference between the two categories isobserver coverage. The Exemption Certificate will cover all the Category I and II fisheriesthat were included in the vessel owner's registration. 8. One commenter believed that using the July 21 date for the start ofthe annual exemption and reporting requirement would be confusing sinceit falls in the middle of many fishing seasons. After the start of the program in July, 1989, NOAA Fisheries plans to usea calendar year for the Exemption Certificates, reporting requirementsand quota monitoring, which is less likely to fall in the middle of a fishingseason. That is, Exemption Certificates will be valid from January 1 throughDecember 31 and reports covering that period will be due at the end ofthe year. 9. Commenters opposed requiring a decal as a proof of the exemption sincethere is already an apparent stigma attached to Category I fisheries anddisplaying a decal serves no useful purpose. Some of these commenters believedthat a decal could potentially subject participating vessels to harm fromradical animal rights groups. NOAA Fisheries believes that a decal will serve to assist in educationand enforcement efforts, and does not believe it will place any fishermanat risk. The decal will not distinguish between Category I and II fisheries.10. One commenter opposed charging a fee for an exemption even though thefisherman may never take a marine mammal. An Exemption Certificate is required to fish legally in a Category I orII fishery regardless of whether or not marine mammals are taken. As providedin section 114(b)(5) of the MMPA, NOAA Fisheries is charging a fee of $30.00to cover administrative costs of granting and renewing Exemption Certificates.No Exemption Certificate is required and no fee will be charged to fishlegally in Category III fisheries, which have only a remote likelihoodof incidentally taking marine mammals. 11. One commenter believed that the regulations should clarify that notakings of southern (California) sea otters and no intentional lethal takingsof Steller sea lions, cetaceans and depleted species are allowed underthis exemption. The interim rule includes these restrictions as prohibitions under andSection;229.4 applicable to Category I, II and III fisheries. 12. Commenters believed that intentional takes to protect gear and catchshould be authorized under this program, as they were under the generalpermits. Other commenters recommended that if intentional takes are authorized,all non-lethal methods be required before taking more serious steps. Onecommenter recommended that NOAA Fisheries specify that any intentionallethal takings in a Category III fishery are illegal since a need to takemarine mammals intentionally would be sufficient basis for listing thefishery in Category II. The interim rule contains provisions (andSection;andSection; 229.6(c) and 229.7(d) and (e)) allowing intentional takings to protect gear, catch or person,similar to those under the general permit system. All non-injurious methodsmust be attempted prior to injuring or killing an animal that is causingimmediate and significant damage. The provisions would also apply to CategoryIII fisheries, although NOAA Fisheries anticipates that there will be few,if any, intentional lethal takings since these fisheries have only a remotepossibility of incidentally taking marine mammals. NOAA Fisheries doesnot believe it is appropriate to place more restrictions on Category IIIfisheries than on Category I or II fisheries. 13. One commenter believed that the exemption should not allow the intentionallethal taking of Alaskan sea otters since the type of interactions thatoccur between this species and fisheries would not justify taking an animalto protect gear, catch or person. Sea otters have been subject to malicioustakings, and such an authorization could be used as an excuse to continuethis practice. Intentional lethal takings of marine mammals are only allowed under theinterim exemption, if necessary to protect gear, catch or person, afterall reasonable non-injurious methods of deterrence have been exhausted.The U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (FWS) concurs with the commenter thatintentional takings of sea otters are not necessary to protect gear, catchor human life. Therefore, there should be little or no need to intentionallylethally take sea otters. However, the FWS recommended, based on the bestavailable scientific information, that the intentional lethal take of Alaskansea otters should be specifically prohibited in this interim rule. Therefore,NOAA Fisheries defers to the FWS on this issue and prohibits the intentionallethal taking of Alaskan sea otters.14. One commenter objected to the observer requirement for Category I fisheriesbecause of increased costs related to liability insurance and to accommodationsfor the observers, and because of the zero tolerance policy on drug possessionmaking the captain responsible for any drug possession by the observers.NOAA Fisheries is required under section 114(e) to place observers on boardcertain vessels engaged in Category I fisheries, with limited exceptions,and intends to reimburse vessel owners for all reasonable costs directlyrelated to housing and maintaining observers. Section 114(e)(7) of theMMPA also contains limits on a vessel owner's liability for observers.Observers will be made aware of the U.S. Coast Guard's zero tolerance policyand their responsibilities to the Federal government and the vessel ownerin regard to the policy. 15. Commenters stated that the role of the required observer should bespecified and that the observer should not act as an enforcement agentwhile on board domestic fishing vessels. Another commenter recommendedthat the regulations state that data obtained from observers or other sourcescan and will be used as the basis for prosecuting fishermen for violatingthe MMPA or the conditions of the interim exemption. The primary purpose of an observer is to collect scientific information.The observers will not have enforcement authority or powers; however, thedata collected by an observer will be used in monitoring quotas for Stellersea lions and North Pacific fur seals. The data can also be used in civilor criminal enforcement proceedings. 16. One commenter recommended that the regulations specify the procedureswhereby vessels in Category II and III fisheries may be asked to take observersand the possible consequences of failing to take observers if requested.The observer requirements apply only to vessels in Category I fisheries.NOAA Fisheries may request vessels in Category II or III to take observers.These vessel owners are not required to take observers, and there are nopenalties for not taking observers. Therefore, NOAA Fisheries does notbelieve it is appropriate to include any specific provisions in the regulations.17. One commenter recommended that the regulations include provisions torequire fishermen to retain and turn in certain critically needed biologicalspecimens since animals killed during commercial fishing operations mayprovide the only reasonable source of certain specimens.NOAA Fisheries has included provisions in andSection; 229.6(c)(10) of thisinterim rule under which the Assistant Administrator may include additionalterms and conditions in Exemption Certificates. Such conditions may includerequirements for retention of biological specimens, if determined appropriate.18. One commenter recommended that special conditions, as allowed underthe MMPA in cases where a fishery will have a significant impact on a species,should be issued as soon as possible and contain measures to reduce impactssuch as limiting the number of marine mammals which may be taken, the locationor season where they may be taken, or the manner or gear that can be used.NOAA Fisheries will follow the procedures for special regulations to implementnecessary mitigating measures when available information indicates a significantadverse impact on a population. (See ``Emergency and Special Regulations''section below.) 19. One commenter believed that any mitigating measures should be as limitedas possible and not be applied across fisheries, since one fishery shouldnot be accountable for interactions in another fishery. NOAA Fisheries agrees; however allowable takes under established quotasmay need to be allocated among fisheries. 20. One commenter believed that Category III fisheries cannot be regulatedon a non-emergency basis even if the fishery poses a significant adverseimpact to a marine mammal population over a period of time longer thanone year. NOAA Fisheries disagrees and believes that section 114(g) of the MMPA providesauthority for placing restrictions on a Category III fishery if the incidentaltaking in the fishery will likely have a significant adverse impact ona marine mammal population. Fisheries are not classified based on impactsto marine mammal populations; rather, they are classified based on theaverage frequency with which marine mammals are incidentally taken in afishery. Therefore, it is possible that the taking incidental to a CategoryIII fishery, combined with other impacts, could have a significant impacton a marine mammal population. 21. One commenter recommended that NOAA Fisheries emphasize that failureto obtain an exemption or to report will expose the fisherman to penaltiesand prevent him or her from obtaining an exemption in following years.The regulations make it clear that failure to obtain an exemption, failureto submit required reports, or failure to comply with other conditionsof the Certificate will subject a vessel owner to civil penalties and/orsuspension, revocation or denial of the Certificate. The specific penaltieswill be evaluated on a case-by-case basis. NOAA Fisheries does not believethat failure to register for an exemption for one year should be a basisfor automatic denial of an Exemption Certificate in all subsequent years.22. One commenter recommended that the role of the FWS be discussed, andthat the appropriate FWS contact persons be identified. Further, if NOAAFisheries takes action contrary to a FWS recommendation, the reasons shouldbe specified and included in the appropriate <T4>Federal Register</T4> publication. NOAA Fisheries is working with the FWS in implementing this exemption system,and will consult with the FWS on actions that affect or relate to marinemammals under the jurisdiction of the Department of the Interior. The FWSrecommendations will be discussed in the appropriate <T4>Federal Register</T4> publications. 23. One commenter objected to the requirement for treaty-Indians to possessand display proof of exemptions without coordinating with the tribes' treatyfishing licenses and permits, as provided for in the amendments.NOAA Fisheries is requiring that vessel owners display a decal on theirvessel and possess an Exemption Certificate to incidentally take marinemammals. NOAA Fisheries intends to use the services and programs of treatyIndian tribes, as well as other Federal agencies, States, and RegionalFishery Management Councils, to the maximum extent practicable, to issueexemptions. 24. One commenter objected to the preparation of implementing regulationswithout consultation with Indian tribes on a government to government basisand objected to the lack of a written commitment by NOAA Fisheries to providefor tribal governments to undertake the implementation (including administration,information gathering, monitoring, and enforcement) of the exemption systemand to provide financial assistance and equipment (firecrackers or otherrepelling devices) to assist tribal governments in the implementation.NOAA Fisheries has encouraged participation by Indian tribes in the rulemakingprocess by providing copies of the List of Fisheries and notices and solicitingcomments. NOAA Fisheries encourages participation by all constituent groupsand will continue to work with representatives of the tribal governmentsto cooperatively implement the exemption system. NOAA Fisheries does notinterpret the purpose of the recent amendments as a mandate to fund orpromote harassment techniques, but rather to gather information on whichto base a long-term marine mammal management regime for the future. Comments on Observer Program 1. Commenters stated that the observer program should be designed to providestatistically reliable estimates of the rate of marine mammals interactions.To ``place observers where the likelihood of observing interactions withmarine mammals would be maximized'' would upwardly bias the interactionestimate and not clearly define the problem. NOAA Fisheries is designing an observer program which will be guided bythe standard outlined in the amendment ``* * * to obtain statisticallyreliable information on the species and number of marine mammals incidentallytaken in the fishery.'' The amendment includes the following requirements:to obtain the best available scientific information; to assign observersfairly and equitably among fisheries and among vessels in a fishery; andto avoid subjecting an individual person or vessel, or group of personsor vessels, to excessive or overly burdensome coverage. Observer reportswill be used to verify the reports submitted by fishermen in Category Ifisheries. Data will be gathered and utilized so that comparisons of marinemammal interactions can be made among and within fisheries. 2. One commenter believed that a good alternative verification programwill be needed since many vessels will not be able to carry observers andinformation is needed on many Category II fisheries which are not requiredto take observers. NOAA Fisheries will design, and as funds permit implement, an alternativeverification program to provide statistically reliable information on thespecies and number of marine mammals incidentally taken in those fisheriesin which an observer cannot be safely accommodated. Alternative programsmay include direct observations of fishing activities from vessels, aircraft,or points on shore. 3. One commenter believed that placing observers on the South Unimak purseseine and Alaska Peninsula drift gillnet fisheries would severely impedefishing operations, impose economic burdens on the owners, and increasethe possibility of injury to crew or observer, and provided informationto document this belief. In addition, the close living quarters on thesesmall vessels would make the use of female observers problematic. The commenteralso believed that, if an observer program is necessary in these fisheries,the use of floating observation platforms would be the most appropriateand effective method. Observations of interactions could be made on a largersegment of the fleet with a minimum of intrusion with any specific vessel.NOAA Fisheries will not place an observer on a vessel if the facilitiesof a vessel for housing the observer, or for carrying out observer functions,are so inadequate or unsafe that the health or safety of the observer orthe safe operation of the vessel would be jeopardized. This determinationwill be made on a case-by-case basis. The response to comment andplusmin;2above addresses alternative verification programs. 4. One commenter believed that harvesting vessels should not be includedin the vessel counts on which the 20 to 35 percent observer coverage iscalculated. In addition, the length of time a vessel fishes should be consideredin the calculation for observer coverage. Although harvesting vessels that deliver fish to a processing vessel withouttaking their catch on board may not be required to carry observers, theseharvesting vessels will be used in calculating observer coverage. The harvestingvessels are the boats that interact with marine mammals. Processing vesselsmay have more than one bag transfer process going on at one time, therefore,20-35 percent observer coverage of the fishing operation may be obtainedonly if more than one observer is placed on a processing vessel. NOAA Fisheriesreserves the right to make the decision as to the number of observers ona processing vessel on a case-by-case basis to insure that statisticallyreliable information is obtained. However, if this method does not providestatistically reliable information on incidental takes, observers willbe required on the harvesting vessels. The length of time a vessel fishes will be considered in determining theextent of observer coverage. However, the length of time a vessel fisheswill not be a factor in determining observer placement. The data managementsystem will be designed so that comparisons of marine mammal interactionscan be made across fisheries taking into account the amount of effort.5. One commenter believed that observer effort should be placed where itwould be most beneficial in assessing real impact on depleted stocks. NOAA Fisheries has classified fisheries based on Congressional intent anddocumented interactions. Section 114(b)(1)(A)(i) of the MMPA does not includecriteria based on the status of or impacts to marine mammal stocks forthe categorization of fisheries. NOAA Fisheries will first assign observersto Category I fisheries vessels. However, if observers cannot be assignedto all the fisheries listed in Category I, NOAA Fisheries will allocateavailable observers according to the following priority: (1) Those fisheriesthat incidentally take marine mammals from any stock designated as depleted;(2) those fisheries that incidentally take marine mammals from populationstocks that NOAA Fisheries believes are declining; (3) those fisheriesother than those described in 1 and 2 in which the greatest incidentaltake of marine mammals occurs; (4) and any other fishery identified inCategory I. 6. One commenter assumed that observations would be limited to between20 and 35 percent of the fishing operations for all Category I fisheries,both foreign and domestic, and that any alternative program would be equallyapplied to foreign and domestic fisheries to avoid discrimination. Foreign fishery operations are permitted under the Magnuson Fishery Conservationand Management Act which requires 100 percent observer coverage. Observercoverage under the Magnuson Act is not superseded by the less restrictiveobserver requirement of the MMPA. Therefore, foreign fishery activitieswill remain subject to 100% observer coverage. 7. One commenter recommended that existing monitoring programs should beused rather than establishing a new observer program for a fishery. NOAA Fisheries will use existing observer/monitoring programs to the extentpossible and will also augment these programs to meet the requirementsof the MMPA when necessary and practical. 8. One commenter supported using observers to collect data for RegionalFishery Management Councils. NOAA Fisheries will, if requested by Regional Fishery Management Councils,States or other Federal agencies, require observers to collect additionalinformation, including, but not limited, to the quantities, species, andphysical condition of target and non-target fishery resources and seabirds,unless NOAA Fisheries finds in writing, following public notice and opportunityfor comment, that such information will not contribute to the protectionof marine mammals or the understanding of the marine ecosystem, includingfishery resources and seabirds. Other Comments. 1. One commenter believed that non-lethal takes should not be counted againstthe quota for Steller sea lions and North Pacific fur seals. Other commentersrecommended that the information system continuously track the number ofthese animals taken to determine when quotas are reached. NOAA Fisheries intends to count only lethal takes against the quota, andis developing a proposed system to monitor the quota. (See ``Quota Management''section below.)2. Commenters believed that environmental groups should be consulted indeveloping the proposed system to govern the incidental taking of marinemammals after section 114 of the MMPA expires, and believed that FWS shouldbe given lead responsibility for aspects of this recommendation relevantto their species. NOAA Fisheries will consult with all interested parties, including theMarine Mammal Commission, Regional Fishery Management Councils, the FWS,fishing interests and environmental groups in developing its proposed systemand its recommendations to Congress. 3. One commenter stressed the need for comprehensive data on populationabundance, productivity and sources of mortality in order to develop thelong-term management program mandated by Congress. NOAA Fisheries agrees that more information is needed, and is redirectingits research program to seek that information. 4. Commenters stressed the need for a good education program to work withindustry concerning the requirements and the importance and benefits ofaccurate reporting. One commenter believed that the education program shouldnot be aimed solely at fishermen_there are many misconceptions about fishermenand their interactions with marine mammals. NOAA Fisheries agrees that a good education program is important and anticipatescooperation from the fishing industry and conservation community in theseefforts. 5. One commenter recommended that conservation/recovery plans be developedand implemented promptly. NOAA Fisheries is developing conservation plans for the North Pacific furseal and Steller sea lion. Conservation plans for other depleted specieswill be prepared at a later time unless NOAA Fisheries determines thata plan will not promote the conservation of the species. <ITAG tagnum="84">Criteria for Categorizing Fisheries </ITAG>Under the 1988 amendments, NOAA Fisheries must establish three categoriesof commercial fisheries according to whether there is frequent (CategoryI), occasional (Category II) or a remote likelihood or no known (CategoryIII) incidental taking of marine mammals. To classify fisheries, it isnecessary to interpret and define ``frequent,'' ``occasional'' and ``remotelikelihood.'' Based on NOAA Fisheries' interpretation of Congressionalintent, these terms and the subsequent placement of fisheries into categorieswere not to be based on the status of stocks of marine mammal species orthe likelihood of significant impacts on a species. Actions, such as emergencyrules, mitigating measures and alternative verification programs. are availableunder section 114 to address situations where incidental take may be adverselyaffecting a marine mammal population or where more information is needed.NOAA Fisheries believes that ``frequent,'' ``occasional'' and ``remotelikelihood'' were intended by Congress to be evaluated on the average frequencywith which marine mammals are taken incidentally in a fishery. This interpretationwould place observers in fisheries where the likelihood of observing incidentaltakes of marine mammals would be greatest. In evaluating incidental takesfor purposes of categorizing fisheries, NOAA Fisheries considers the definitionof take in section 3 of the MMPA, the language of section 114, and thelegislative history of the 1988 amendments, including the Senate Report,House Report and floor statements. To determine the frequency of take, it is necessary to define both thelevel or amount of taking and the time period over which incidental takingswill be evaluated. This will allow the calculation of a rate of takingso that a comparison among fisheries can be made. The rate is used to distinguishbetween fisheries with frequent, occasional and rare taking. The valueschosen to define these categories should reflect Congressional intent andshould be such that each category would contain fisheries. One of the primary purposes of the interim exemption system is to obtainreliable information on species and number of marine mammals incidentallytaken in commercial fishing operations. Categorizing fisheries will assistNOAA Fisheries in selecting the appropriate method for verifying the reportsreceived from fishermen in a particular fishery. Observers will have thehighest probability of seeing incidental takes of marine mammals in fisherieswith frequent interactions. Therefore, the expense of placing observersin a Category I fishery is justified by the high probability they willcollect sufficient information to assess accurately the total takings ina fishery and to verify the accuracy of fishermen's reports. Observersare not as likely to see marine mammal takes in Category II fisheries andother verification techniques may be more efficient. In the proposed List of Fisheries, NOAA Fisheries set the level of takeat more than one animal for frequent, one or less for occasional, and nearzero for remote. Using this level of take, NOAA Fisheries believes thata 20-day period is a reasonable time period to use when determining thefrequency of taking for purposes of classifying fisheries.Using these standards, ``frequent'' means that it is highly likely thatmore than one marine mammal will be incidentally taken by a randomly selectedvessel in the fishery during a 20-day period. ``Occasional'' means thatthere is some likelihood that one marine mammal will be incidentally takenby a randomly selected vessel in the fishery during a 20-day period, butthat there is little likelihood that more than one marine mammal will beincidentally taken. And, ``remote likelihood'' means that it is highlyunlikely that any marine mammal will be incidentally taken by a randomlyselected vessel in the fishery during a 20-day period. These definitions are applied to categorize fisheries according to thefollowing guidelines. If sufficient documented information is availableto estimate the frequency of incidental takings of marine mammals, thatinformation is used in categorizing that fishery. If there is not sufficientdocumented information to estimate the frequency of incidental takings,the agency considers other factors that would indicate the likelihood ofincidental takings such as fishing techniques and gear used, methods usedto deter marine mammals, target species, seasons and areas fished, andspecies and distribution of marine mammals in the area. If these factorsindicate a likelihood of at least occasional incidental takings, the fisheryis placed in Category II. If available information or other factors indicatethat the likelihood of incidental takings in a fishery would be so rareor exceptional as to be remote or non-existent, that fishery is placedin Category III. The Committee Reports (Senate Report 100-592 and House of RepresentativesReport 200-970) recognize that for the first year section 114 is in effect,there may not be adequate data to determine accurately the placement ofall fisheries into categories. Accordingly, these reports specified sixfisheries to be included in Category I and two fisheries to be includedin Category III. Most of these fisheries were identified and jointly suggestedto Congress by representatives of the environmental community and the fishingindustry. The Senate Report also specified that the South Unimak (FalsePass and Unimak Pass) salmon purse seine fishery should be included inCategory I, but the House Report did not. However, in a letter concerningthe proposed List of Fisheries, the Senior Senator from Alaska stated thatthe South Unimak salmon purse seine fishery would not have been suggestedfor inclusion in Category I if additional information now available hadbeen brought to the attention of the Senate. NOAA Fisheries used this Congressionalintent as criteria for classifying fisheries in the final List of Fisheries(April 20, 1989; 54 FR 16072). However, for future revisions to the Listof Fisheries, NOAA Fisheries will use all available data, including datafrom fishermen's reports and results of observer and alternative programs,to classify fisheries. After a year, NOAA Fisheries should have sufficientdata to determine if these fisheries are categorized properly. If sufficientdata are not available, NOAA Fisheries will rely on Congressional intentwhen classifying fisheries. The interim rule contains the following criteria in andSection; 229.03 forclassifying fisheries when revising the List of Fisheries: <T3>Category I. </T3>(1) There is documented information indicating a ``frequent''incidental taking of marine mammals in the fishery, or (2) Congress intendedthat the fishery be placed in Category I and there is not documented informationindicating that it should be placed in another Category. <T3>Category II. </T3>(1) There is documented information indicating an``occasional'' incidental taking in the fishery, or, (2) in the absenceof information indicating the frequency of incidental taking of marinemammals, other factors such as fishing techniques, gear used, methods usedto deter marine mammals, target species, seasons and areas fished, andspecies and distribution of marine mammals in the area suggest there isa likelihood of at least an ``occasional'' incidental taking in the fishery.<T3>Category III. </T3>(1) There is information indicating no more thana ``remote likelihood'' of an incidental taking of a marine mammal in thefishery, (2) in the absence of information indicating the frequency ofincidental taking of marine mammals, other factors such as fishing techniques,gear used, methods used to deter marine mammals, target species, seasonsand areas fished, and species and distribution of marine mammals in thearea suggest there is no more than a remote likelihood of an incidentaltake in the fishery, or (3) Congress intended that the fishery be placedin Category III and there is not documented information indicating thatit should be placed in another Category. The criteria for classifying fisheries are set forth in andSection; 229.3of this interim rule. In addition, the regulations contain the requirementthat the List of Fisheries be reviewed annually beginning in 1990, andmay be amended at any time if available information warrants. The annualchanges to the List of Fisheries will be published on or about October1 and will be effective January 1 of the next calendar year. Additionalchanges may be published and made effective during the year if availableinformation warrants. All affected Category I and II vessel owners willbe notified of any changes. If a fishery is changed from Category III toCategory I or II, NOAA Fisheries will notify the fishing community throughnewspapers of general circulation, fishery trade associations, trade journals,electronic media, and through State agencies and Regional Fishery ManagementCouncils.<ITAG tagnum="84">Interim Commercial Fishing Exemption </ITAG>Certain incidental takings of marine mammals in commercial fishing operationswill be legal under the 5-year interim exemption system provided certainconditions are met. Under these regulations, owners of vessels will berequired to register with NOAA Fisheries, display a decal on their vessel,possess an Exemption Certificate authorizing the incidental take of marinemammals, and maintain logs and submit periodic reports to engage lawfullyunder the MMPA in any Category I or II fishery. Vessels engaged in CategoryI fisheries will be required to take on board a natural resources observerif requested by NOAA Fisheries. Owners of vessels engaged only in CategoryIII fisheries will not be required to register with NOAA Fisheries or toobtain an Exemption Certificate or decal to fish legally or to incidentallytake marine mammals; however, they will be required to submit reports ofall marine mammals incidentally killed as a result of their fishing operations.In addition, owners and masters of vessels in all categories will be requiredto comply with any general regulations, any conditions of the ExemptionCertificate issued to the vessel owner, and any special or emergency regulationspublished under the authority of section 114 of the MMPA. The 5-year interim exemption applies only to U.S. commercial fishing vesselsor to those foreign vessels with valid fishing permits issued under section204(b) of the Magnuson Fishery Conservation and Management Act (16 U.S.C.1801 <T3>et seq.</T3>). Exemptions provided by section 114 of the MMPA are notavailable to vessels fishing in the yellowfin tuna purse seine fisheryin the eastern tropical Pacific, or to foreign treaty fisheries, such asthe Japanese salmon driftnet fishery. The interim exemption applies tocommercial fishing operations which are defined in andSection; 229.2(g) ofthis interim rule to include licensed commercial passenger fishing vessels.Therefore, certain charter and party boats fall under these requirements.The MMPA exemption does not include authority to incidentally take southern(California) sea otters (<T3>Enhydra lutris nereis</T3>). This subspecies historically ranged alongthe West coast of the United States, but currently is found only alongthe central California coast and San Nicolas Island, California. Section114 of the MMPA does not supersede or otherwise affect the provisions ofPub. L. 99-625, passed by Congress in 1986 to govern the translocationof southern sea otters to San Nicolas Island for research and recoverypurposes. Within special zones established for this experimental population,certain restrictions on incidental taking under the MMPA do not apply.(See 50 CFR 17.84(d) for a description of these special zones and activitiesthat can be lawfully conducted within these zones.) The MMPA exemption does not allow the intentional lethal taking of anySteller sea lions, any cetaceans (whales and dolphins), any depleted marinemammals (including the Pribilof Island population of North Pacific furseals), or any endangered or threatened marine mammals. In general, the MMPA exemptions will apply to the taking of endangeredand threatened marine mammals (except southern sea otters). Restrictionson the MMPA exemptions may be made to reduce the incidental taking or toprohibit any taking of certain endangered and threatened species, if necessaryto minimize adverse impacts to a population or to comply with other statutoryrequirements. However, the MMPA exemption does not exempt fishermen fromthe prohibitions on taking endangered and threatened species under theESA. To be exempt from the taking prohibitions under the ESA, additionaltaking authorization under the ESA is needed. NOAA Fisheries is conducting the appropriate consultations under section7 of the ESA concerning the effects of its regulations and the proposedissuance of Exemption Certificates. The Biological Opinions resulting fromthe consultations will assess the impacts of the fisheries on endangeredand threatened species and will conclude whether or not the actions arelikely to jeopardize the continued existence of endangered or threatenedspecies or result in the destruction or adverse modification of the criticalhabitat of such species. NOAA Fisheries may place conditions or restrictionson Exemption Certificates to fulfill its obligations under section 7 ofthe ESA. These conditions and restrictions may include actions to reducethe incidental taking or may prohibit any taking of an endangered or threatenedspecies. <ITAG tagnum="84">Exemption Certificates_Categories I and II </ITAG><T3>Registration process. </T3>All vessel owners (or authorized representatives)must register to obtain an Exemption Certificate and decal for each vesselthat will be engaged in a Category I or II fishery. The initial registrationwill cover the remainder of 1989 and all of 1990. After that, registrationsto renew Certificates are required each calendar year. Registration forms, outlining the required information, are available fromNOAA Fisheries. One registration per vessel is required and will coverall Category I and II fisheries in which the vessel will participate duringthe calendar year. The first page of the form should be sent to one ofthe NOAA Fisheries offices listed in andSection; 229.5(c); the second pageis a copy of the registration and will serve as an indication of registrationuntil an Exemption Certificate is issued. For renewals, completed registration forms, containing the informationon file with NOAA Fisheries, will be sent to existing Certificate holdersprior to the beginning of the year. Vessel owners will be required to makeany necessary corrections and sign and return the form to NOAA Fisheries.The renewal registration forms should be submitted at least 30 days priorto the vessel engaging in a Category I or II fishery. In addition to owners of commercial fishing vessels, the definition of``vessel owners'' (andSection; 229.3(p)) includes owners of fixed or otherfishing gear that is used in a ``non-vessel fishery.'' A ``non-vessel fishery''means a commercial fishing operation that uses fixed or other fishing gearwithout a vessel, such as gear used in set gillnet, trap, beach seine,weir, ranch and pen fisheries. Owners of such gear are subject to the samerequirements and restrictions as owners of fishing vessels or fish processingvessels operating in a commercial fishery. A fee of $30.00 per vessel must accompany each registration or requestfor renewal. ``Vessel owners'' in ``non-vessel fisheries'' must include$30.00 to register all gear owned. The fees collected in connection withthe exemption system will be available to NOAA Fisheries to cover the administrativecosts of granting Exemption Certificates and renewals.<T3>Issuance of Exemption Certificates and decals. </T3>An Exemption Certificatethat specifies applicable terms and conditions of any authorized incidentaltaking and a vessel decal will be issued to the vessel owner for each vesselto be engaged in a Category I or II fishery and who submits a completedregistration form and the required fee. The initial Certificate will bevalid the remainder of 1989 and all of 1990. After that, Certificate renewalswill be issued each year after receipt of an updated registration, requiredfee and required report(s) covering all registered Category I and II fisheries.A decal will be issued with the initial Certificate and will be valid for1989. An annual sticker for 1990 will be automatically issued upon receiptof a report covering 1989. In non-vessel fisheries, the 1990 sticker mustbe affixed to the Certificate. Annual stickers will be issued along withthe Certificate renewal in subsequent years. Decals, along with the annual sticker, must be attached to the vessel portside on the cabin or, in the absence of a cabin, port side forward on thehull. A replacement decal will be issued, if requested, to replace a lostor damaged decal. Decals will not be issued or required to be posted innon-vessel fisheries. A copy of the Exemption Certificate must be on board the vessel while itis operating in a Category I or II fishery, or, in the case of a non-vesselfishery, a copy of the Certificate must be in the possession of the personin charge of the fishing operation. A copy of the Certificate must be madeavailable upon request to any State or Federal government official authorizedto enforce the provisions of the MMPA or to any designated agent of NOAAFisheries.<T3>Reporting requirements. </T3>NOAA Fisheries will issue a proposed ruleto govern the reporting requirements under the exemption system, and willrequest public comment. <T3>Observer requirements. </T3>If requested by NOAA Fisheries, the ownerof a vessel engaged in a Category I fishery must take on board a naturalresources observer. A vessel may be excepted from this requirement if NOAAFisheries finds that the facilities for housing the observer or for carryingout observer functions are so inadequate or unsafe that the health or safetyof the observer or the safe operation of the vessel would be jeopardized.Vessel owners, masters and crew members are required to cooperate withobservers and are required to provide information, such as vessel location,needed to meet the observers' responsibilities. If feasible and if requestedby the observer, marine mammals killed during the fishing operation whichare readily accessible to crew members must be brought aboard the vesselfor biological processing and may be retained by NOAA Fisheries. NOAA Fisheriesrecognizes that for many smaller vessels, this will not be feasible and,therefore, would not be required. Observers may not bring a civil action against the vessel or vessel ownerunder any law of the United States for any illness, disability or deathfrom service as an observer, with two exceptions. First, an observer maybring a civil action against an owner or vessel for the owner's willfulmisconduct. Second, the observer's limitation on bringing civil actionsdoes not apply if the observer is performing duties in service to the vesselof the sort that would normally be performed by a crew member. NOAA Fisheries will provide for the payment of reasonable costs of housingand maintaining observers on board vessels and of maintaining biologicalspecimens if requested by the observer or required in the Exemption Certificate.<T3>Other terms and conditions. </T3>The Exemption Certificate will bevalid for one calendar year, except that Certificates issued in 1989 willcover the remainder of 1989 and all of 1990. Vessel owners must registereach year for a Certificate or renewal. After 1989, a current annual stickeris required for the vessel decal to be valid. The Certificates will authorize fishermen to intentionally take marinemammals (except southern sea otters), without inflicting injury or deathto the marine mammals, to protect catch, gear, or person. If the damageis substantial and immediate and after all practicable non-injurious methodshave been taken, fishermen may injure or kill certain non-depleted marinemammals. However, in no case may fishermen intentionally kill Steller sealions, Alaskan sea otters, any cetaceans (whales and dolphins), any depletedmarine mammals (including the Pribilof Island population of North Pacificfur seals), or any endangered or threatened marine mammals under the interimexemption. If firearms or other potentially injurious methods are used to deter Stellersea lions, cetaceans, or depleted, endangered or threatened marine mammals,due care must be exercised to avoid injuring or killing such marine mammals.If the use of firearms or other means results in an injury or mortality,the taking is presumed to be an intentional lethal take. For example, ifa fisherman shoots near a Steller sea lion to scare or harass the animalaway from his catch or gear and the animal is killed, that taking wouldbe considered an intentional lethal taking and would be illegal. Other terms and conditions may be made to Exemption Certificates as determinedby NOAA Fisheries. For example, animals killed during commercial fishingoperations may provide the only source of certain types of important biologicalspecimens. Certificates may be conditioned to require that biological specimensof scientific value be retained for NOAA scientists. In the case of endangered or threatened species, NOAA Fisheries may includeterms and conditions to MMPA Exemption Certificates, at any time, to fulfillits responsibilities under the ESA. These conditions may include actionsor restrictions to reduce or prevent the incidental taking of an endangeredor threatened species. <T3>Suspension or revocation of Exemption Certificates. </T3>NOAA Fisheriesmay suspend or revoke a Certificate or may deny a Certificate renewal ifthe Certificate holder (1) fails to report as required, (2) fails to takeon board an observer in a Category I fishery, if requested, or (3) failsto comply with other terms and conditions of the Exemption Certificateor the regulations governing the interim exemption. The suspension, revocationor denial may occur without notice and opportunity for hearing in the caseof failure to submit required reports. Other actions are subject to NOAA'scivil procedures contained in subpart D of 15 CFR Part 904.<ITAG tagnum="84">Requirements for Category III Fisheries </ITAG>Owners of vessels engaged only in Category III fisheries are not requiredto register with NOAA Fisheries or to obtain an Exemption Certificate tofish legally under the MMPA or to incidentally take marine mammals. However,they will be required to report all lethal incidental takings, make allreasonable efforts to release animals unharmed, and use all practicablenon-injurious methods before any lethal intentional take of a marine mammalto protect gear, catch, or lives in accordance with these regulations.The taking of southern (California) sea otters and the intentional lethaltaking of Steller sea lions, Alaskan sea otters, cetaceans, and depletedspecies (including the Pribilof Island population of North Pacific furseals) is prohibited. In addition, the incidental taking of endangeredor threatened marine mammals is not exempted from the prohibitions underthe ESA unless otherwise authorized. <ITAG tagnum="84">Emergency and Special Regulations </ITAG>The 1988 amendments to the MMPA provide NOAA Fisheries with both emergencyand general authority to issue regulations and/or to impose conditionsand restrictions on Exemption Certificates to prevent significant adverseimpacts on marine mammal populations. Regulations can apply to CategoryI, II or III fisheries. If NOAA Fisheries finds that the incidental taking of marine mammals ina fishery is having an immediate and significant adverse impact on a marinemammal population, emergency regulations will be issued to prevent or minimizeto the maximum extent practicable any further taking. This emergency authoritywill be used only when no alternative is available to prevent an immediateand significant adverse impact. NOAA Fisheries must consult with the RegionalFishery Management Councils, State fishery agencies, and treaty Indiantribal governments, where appropriate, before taking any emergency action.Emergency actions will, to the maximum extent practicable, avoid interferingwith existing Regional, State or tribal fishery management or conservationprograms, will be as brief in duration and non-intrusive as possible, andwill take into account the economics of the fisheries that may be affectedand the availability of existing technology to minimize impacts. Althougheconomic factors will be considered in determining the most appropriatemethod to mitigate the impacts, the primary purpose of the MMPA is to protectmarine mammals and economic considerations will not be used as a basisfor not taking a necessary emergency action. Emergency actions may include,but are not limited to: Quotas on the number of marine mammals that maybe taken; restrictions on the time, manner and location in which marinemammals may be taken; restrictions on the time and location where the fisherymay operate; and prohibitions on the use of fishing techniques or gearwhich are found to cause excessive marine mammal injuries or mortalities.If NOAA Fisheries finds that the incidental taking of marine mammals ina fishery is not having an immediate and significant adverse impact ona marine mammal population, but that it will likely have a significantadverse impact over a period of time longer than one year, NOAA Fisherieswill request the Regional Fishery Management Councils, State fisheriesagencies, or treaty Indian tribal governments, where appropriate, to initiateor take action to minimize such impact. If the appropriate Councils, Statesor tribes do not act in a reasonable period of time, special regulationswill be issued or special conditions may be imposed on Exemption Certificatesto mitigate the adverse impacts. What constitutes a reasonable period oftime will depend on the nature of the requested action and the severityof impacts to the marine mammals in the absence of any action. Any suchregulations or conditions will be issued only after notice and opportunityfor public comment and only after finding that such action is necessaryto further the purposes of the MMPA. Special regulations or conditionswill, to the maximum extent practicable, avoid interfering with existingRegional, State or tribal fishery management or conservation programs,and will take into account the views of the appropriate Regional FisheryManagement Councils, States, Tribes and the public. As with emergency regulations,special regulations or conditions may include operational or gear restrictionson the fishery. <ITAG tagnum="84">Quota Management </ITAG>The 1988 amendments establish a quota of 1,350 Steller sea lions and 50North Pacific fur seals that may be incidentally killed each year in allfisheries combined under the exemption system. If NOAA Fisheries determinesthat more than this number of animals will be killed, NOAA Fisheries mayprescribe emergency regulations to prevent or minimize further takes inaccordance with the procedures described above. These emergency actionsmay include restrictions on the time and locations where the fishery mayoperate. Since situations may arise in which a large number of Stellersea lions or North Pacific fur seals are killed by a fishery early in theyear, thereby potentially preventing other fisheries from operating laterin the year, Congress anticipated that NOAA Fisheries would work with theappropriate Fishery Management Councils, States, fishermen and other interestedparties to develop a system of allocating lethal takes among fisheries.NOAA Fisheries has not yet developed a proposed system for monitoring theincidental take in various fisheries to determine when quotas may be reachedor for allocating takes, but will be working with Councils, States, majorfishing associations and the conservation community to develop a proposedprogram and is requesting public comments. NOAA Fisheries believes thatit is not practicable to develop a program for the period July 21 throughDecember 31, 1989, because most Alaskan and West Coast fisheries that takeSteller sea lions and North Pacific fur seals will be half or fully completedby July 21. Reports received from fishermen at the end of a season or annually willbe of little value in mitigating the effects of disproportionately largetakings of any species as they are occurring. A more timely monitoringsystem will be needed to determine if unexpectedly large numbers of animalsare being taken in any fishery. In addition to the creation of a timelyreporting system, the development of an allocation system and regulationswhich restrict fishing in areas with high incidental takes of either speciesmay be necessary to implement the quota system. Possible actions that NOAAFisheries could take to address these concerns include the following: 1. <T3>Reports. </T3>In conjunction with the States, NOAA Fisheries may proposeto add Steller sea lions and North Pacific fur seals to the list of specieswhich are reported on fish tickets in order to obtain timely reports. Anyfish tickets indicating takes of these animals would need to be immediatelyreported to NOAA Fisheries.2. Allocations. By combining the previous year's observer data, as wellas logbook data and data provided by fisheries associations, NOAA Fisheriesmay be able to determine if problems are occurring or where or when theyare likely to occur. If necessary, NOAA Fisheries would propose a schemefor 1990 or subsequent years to allocate future takings fairly among involvedfisheries. In addition, if incidental take reports or other informationindicated that any quota were exceeded in one year, the excess number ofanimals killed might be deducted from the next year's quota. 3. Regulations. If, during any fishing season, it appears that quotas maybe exceeded, or that takes are unexpectedly high in certain areas, NOAAFisheries would issue emergency regulations to restrict or terminate fishingin problem areas. 4. Status of stocks. If available information indicates that the authorizedlevels of incidental takes will likely have a significant adverse impacton the marine mammal population, NOAA Fisheries may issue emergency orspecial regulations to limit the taking further. <ITAG tagnum="84">Penalties/Enforcement </ITAG>Violations of section 114 of the MMPA, these regulations or the ExemptionCertificates will subject vessel owners and fishermen to the penaltiesprovided in the MMPA and in NOAA regulations governing administrative proceduresfor the assessment of penalties (15 CFR Part 904; 52 FR 10324, March 31,1987). However, prior to January 1, 1990, unknowing violations of theserequirements will not subject a fisherman to penalties. Congress addedthis exception to account for situations where, because a fisherman wasinvolved in a fishery before the appropriate exemption forms and decalswere available or because of the remote location of the fishery, the fishermanhad no way of knowing of the requirements or did not have the ability toobtain an exemption. Therefore, NOAA Fisheries has defined ``unknowingviolations'' to include situations where the violator can establish thathe or she has not received prior notice of the requirement violated, andhas not had the opportunity to receive notice. In addition, as noted above, Certificates may be revoked, suspended ordenied for violations of the MMPA, the regulations or the terms and conditionsof the Certificates. NOAA Fisheries' Enforcement Policy for Takings of Marine Mammals Incidentalto Commercial Fishing published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on December 6, 1988 (53 FR 49214) remains ineffect until July 21, 1989, the effective date of the prohibitions sectionsof this interim rule. <ITAG tagnum="84">Observer Program </ITAG>NOAA Fisheries is required to place observers on Category I vessels tomonitor between 20 and 35 percent of the fishing operations by vesselsin the fishery. The purpose of the observer coverage is to obtain statisticallyreliable information on the species and number of marine mammals incidentallytaken in a fishery, to verify the adequacy of self-reporting by vesselowners, and to identify possible means for reducing such takes. The extentof observer coverage will be determined as a percentage of fishing effortor activity rather than as a percentage of the number of vessels engagedin the fishery. The specific design of the observer program, includinghow long an observer will be placed on a particular vessel, will vary betweenfisheries. When determining the distribution of observers among fisheries and betweenvessels in a particular fishery, NOAA Fisheries shall be guided by thefollowing standards: (1) The requirements to obtain the best available scientific informationavailable; (2) The requirement that assignment of observers is fair and equitableamong fisheries and among vessels in a fishery;(3) The requirement that no individual person or vessel, or group of personsor vessels, be subject to excessive or overly burdensome observer coverage;(4) And where practicable, the need to minimize costs and avoid duplication.NOAA Fisheries is not required to place an observer on a Category I vesselif: (1) Statistically reliable information can be obtained from observers onprocessing vessels to which Category I harvesting vessels deliver a catchthat has not been taken on board the harvesting vessel; (2) The facilities of the vessel for housing an observer or for carryingout the functions of the observer are so inadequate or unsafe that thehealth or safety of the observer or the safe operation of the vessel wouldbe jeopardized as determined by NOAA Fisheries; or (3) An observer is not available. The first exception contemplates the situation where Category I vesselcatcher/harvester boats do not bring the catch on board, but deliver fishdirectly to a floating processor on which an observer is placed. For example,observers on foreign vessels in over-the-side joint ventures may satisfythe observer requirements, and observers would not be needed on the catcher/harvesterboats. However, if this method will not provide statistically reliableinformation on incidental takes to protect gear or catch, observers willbe required on the harvesting vessels. With respect to the adequacy of vessels to take an observer on board, NOAAFisheries will make the necessary determinations on a case by case basis.These determinations will be made on a vessel class or fishery basis oron an individual vessel basis. Examples of situations in which observerswill not be required are if a vessel is too small to carry (or house) anobserver safely, if an observer will displace a crew member, or if fishinggear or the vessel cannot be operated safely because of the presence ofan observer. The exception for unavailability of observers includes situations whereNOAA Fisheries may have inadequate funds to cover a full observer programor may not be able to employ or contract for sufficient qualified personnelto fully staff an observer program. To minimize these situations, NOAAFisheries intends to use observers, to the maximum extent possible, placedunder other authorities, such as the Magnuson Fishery Conservation andManagement Act, to collect marine mammal interaction information, in additionto their other duties, to fulfill the observer requirements of the MMPA.If NOAA Fisheries is unable to meet the required observer level, observerswill be allocated among Category I fisheries according to the followinglist of priorities as specified in section 224(e)(3) of the MMPA: (1) Those fisheries that incidentally take marine mammals from populationstocks designated as depleted; (2) Those fisheries that incidentally take marine mammals from populationstocks that are declining: (3) Those fisheries other than those described in l and 2, in which thegreatest incidental take of marine mammals occur; and (4) Any other Category I fishery. If observers cannot be placed on Category I vessels at the required level,NOAA Fisheries shall establish alternative observation and verificationprograms to supplement or replace the statutorily mandated on-board observerprogram. The alternative program may include direct observation of fishingactivities from vessels, airplanes, or points on shore. Provided sufficient resources are available, an alternative program mayalso be established in any fishery for which reliable information is nototherwise obtainable. Voluntary observer programs for Category II and IIIfisheries will be considered provided that they meet the safety and scientificinformation criteria set forth for Category I fisheries observer programsand that the observer requirements for Category I fisheries have been met.NOAA Fisheries, in coordination with Federal and State scientists and personnelexperienced in fishery observer programs, is designing its observer programto obtain statistically reliable information on the species and numberof marine mammals incidentally taken in as many Category I fisheries aspossible. The level of observer coverage and whether or not an alternativeprogram will be used will be determined for each Category I fishery. Thesedeterminations will be based on the size and nature of each Category Ifishery and on the resources available for these programs. NOAA Fisherieswill try to make the best use of available resources by using existingresearch programs, programs operated by States or other authorities, oralternative programs where statistically reliable information can be obtainedat less cost. NOAA Fisheries will make available its proposed program andwill request further public comment. Although the primary purpose of the observer program is to collect dataon incidental take of marine mammals, observers are not limited to thisactivity. Regional Fishery Management Councils, States or other Federalagencies may request NOAA Fisheries to collect other scientific or biologicalinformation, such as fishery resources and sea bird data, needed in theirresource conservation and management programs. NOAA Fisheries will requirethe observer to collect the requested additional information unless NOAAFisheries finds in writing, and after opportunity for public comment, thatthe collection of the requested information will interfere with the collectionof the information related to marine mammals. <ITAG tagnum="84">Information Management </ITAG>NOAA Fisheries is developing an information management system to compile,process, store and analyze data received from fishermen's reports, observerand alternative programs, and other sources. To protect the confidentialityof data, the information from the system will be made available to thepublic only in aggregate form which does not directly or indirectly disclosethe identity or business of any person. Such information will be availableon a continuing basis, no later than six months after receipt. Dependingon the nature of information requests, appropriate user fees may be chargedfor the information.Confidential or proprietary information will not be disclosed except: (1) To Federal employees requiring such information, including to Federalcontractors that are authorized to collect, process or analyze report orobserver data and that are bound by the restrictions on public releaseof such data; (2) To State employees under agreement with NOAA Fisheries that preventspublic disclosure of the identity or business of any person; (3) When required by court order; or (4) In the case of scientific information involving fisheries, to employeesof Regional Fishery Management Councils. Under (1) and (3) above, information from observers or from fishermen reportsindicating a violation of the MMPA, regulations, or terms and conditionsof Exemption Certificates may be used in civil or criminal enforcementproceedings. <ITAG tagnum="84">Classification </ITAG>This rule is being issued as an interim rule because it is impracticableand contrary to the public interest to follow the notice of proposed rulemakingand public procedure provisions of section 553 of the Administrative ProcedureAct (APA; 5 U.S.C. 553). The MMPA amendments provide that vessel ownersin Categories I and II cannot lawfully fish after July 21, 1989, unlessthey are exempted from MMPA prohibitions. To be exempted by July 21, 1989,these vessel owners are required to register with NOAA Fisheries and receivesome physical evidence of their exemption. It is not possible to publisha proposed rule to establish a registration and exemption system, solicitpublic comments on the proposed rule, and issue a final rule in time toallow all affected fishing vessel owners a sufficient opportunity to registerfor and receive an Exemption Certificate before July 21, 1989, rather thanmerely to notify fishermen of the requirements of this rule before thatdate. Because many vessel owners will not be able to register during theirsometimes lengthy fishing trips, a ``last-minute'' opportunity to registershortly before July 21, 1989, is not sufficient. Therefore, NOAA Fisheriesfinds for good cause that the proposed rulemaking and public procedureprovisions of section 553 of the APA do not apply to this rule. For these same reasons, NOAA Fisheries finds that it is contrary to thepublic interest and impracticable to publish those portions of the interimrule governing the registration and exemption system 30 days before theireffective date as required by section 553(d) of the APA. However, the 30-dayrequirement is not being waived for the remaining portions of the interimrule relating to prohibitions on fishing which do not become effectiveuntil July 21, 1989. Notwithstanding the publication of this rule as an interim rule, it isbased on considerable public input and comment. The legislation mandatingthe exemption system is based upon a joint  proposal from representativesof the fishing industry and the environmental community. In addition, theagency issued an advance notice of proposed Rulemaking on general requirementsof the exemption system on January 27, 1989, and invited comment untilFebruary 27, 1989. The interim rule was developed in part with the informationreceived from these public comments. NOAA Fisheries also has consultedState agencies, Regional Fishery Management Councils, representatives ofthe fishing industry and environmental community and other interested parties.Moreover, this interim rule invites additional public comment for a 60-dayperiod thereby allowing for the modification or amendment of this rulewith the publication of a subsequent final rule. The Assistant Administrator has determined that implementation of the regulationsof 50 CFR Part 229 will not have a significant impact on the human environment.NOAA Fisheries has prepared an environmental assessment (EA) on this action.The finding of that EA is that there will be no significant impact on thehuman environment as a result of this rule and that an environmental impactstatement is not required. The EA is available upon request (see <T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT</T2>). The Under Secretary for Oceans and Atmosphere, Department of Commerce,has determined that this rule is not a major rule requiring a regulatoryimpact analysis under Executive Order 12291. The rule provides relief froma regulatory burden under the MMPA by exempting commercial fishermen registeredunder this exemption system from prohibitions against the incidental takeof marine mammals in the course of commercial fishing activities. Thisrule will not result in (1) an annual major increase in costs or pricesfor consumers, individual industries or government agencies; (2) an annualeffect on the economy of $100 million or more; or (3) significant adverseeffect on competition, employment, productivity, innovation, or on theability of U.S.-based enterprises to compete with foreign-based enterprisesin domestic or export markets. The General Counsel of the Department of Commerce has certified to theSmall Business Administration that this interim rule will not have a significanteconomic impact on a substantial number of small entities. As a result,a regulatory flexibility analysis was not prepared. This rule contains a collection of information subject to the PaperworkReduction Act of 1980 (44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq</T3>.) and has been approved by the Office of Management andBudget under control number 0648-0224. The collection of information requirementwhich is subject to the Paperwork Reduction Act is found at 50 CFR 229.5(a).Public reporting burden for this collection of information is estimatedto average 15 minutes per response per year to register for an exemption.These estimates include the time for reviewing instructions, searchingexisting data sources, gathering and maintaining the data needed, and completingand reviewing the collection of information. Send comments regarding thisburden estimate or any other aspect of this collection of information,including suggestions for reducing this burden, to the National MarineFisheries Service, F/PRl, 1335 East West Highway, Silver Spring, MD 20910,and to the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs, Office of Managementand Budget, Washington, DC 20503 (Attn. NOAA Desk Officer). NOAA Fisheries has determined that this rule does not directly affect thecoastal zone of any State that has an approved coastal zone managementprogram under the Coastal Zone Management Act (CZMA). These actions arebeing taken under the MMPA which grants exclusive authority to the Federalgovernment to regulate the takings of marine mammals. This rule imposesadditional registration and reporting requirements on a small segment ofthe fishing industry but the nature of these requirements is such thatby themselves they do not have a direct effect on the coastal zone of anyState. This determination has been submitted for review by the responsibleState agencies under section 307 of the CZMA.This rule has been determined not to contain policies with federalism implicationssufficient to warrant preparation of a federalism assessment under E.O.12612. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects </ITAG>50 CFR Part 216 Administrative practice and procedure, Fisheries, Imports, Indians, Marinemammals, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements. 50 CFR Part 229 Fisheries, Fishing vessels, Marine mammals, Reporting and recordkeeping.50 CFR Part 611 Fish, Fisheries, Reporting and recordkeeping, Foreign relations. <ITAG tagnum="84">Regulation Promulgation  </ITAG>For the reasons set out in the preamble, 50 CFR is amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 216_REGULATIONS GOVERNING THE TAKING AND IMPORTING OF MARINEMAMMALS </ITAG>1. The authority citation for 50 CFR Part 216 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 16 U.S.C. 1361<T3> et seq.</T3>, unless otherwise noted.</ITAG>2. A Note is added to 50 CFR Part 216 immediately following the Table ofContents to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note to Part 216:</T4> See also 50 CFR Parts 228 and 229 for regulationsgoverning certain incidental takings of marine mammals.</ITAG>3. The introductory text of andSection; 216.11 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 216.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Prohibited taking. </ITAG>Except as otherwise provided in Subparts C, D, and I of this Part 216 orin Parts 228 or 229, it is unlawful for: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>4. A Note is added immediately following the heading of andSection; 216.24to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 216.24</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Taking and related acts incidental to commercial fishing operations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note to </T4>andSection; <T4>216.24:</T4> The provisions of 50 CFR Part 229, rather than andSection;216.24, will govern the incidental taking of marine mammals in the courseof commercial fishing operations by persons using vessels of the UnitedStates, other than vessels used in the eastern tropical Pacific yellowfintuna purse seine fishery, and vessels which have valid fishing permitsissued in accordance with section 204(b) of the Magnuson Fishery Conservationand Management Act (16 U.S.C. 1824(b)) for the period from November 23,1988, through October 1, 1993. Other commercial fisheries remain subjectto regulations under andSection; 216.24. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>5. A new part 229 is added to 50 CFR as follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 229_INTERIM EXEMPTION FOR COMMERCIAL FISHERIES UNDER THE MARINEMAMMAL PROTECTION ACT OF 1972 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General Provisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">229.1 Purpose and scope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">229.2 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">229.3 Criteria for categorizing fisheries. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">229.4 Prohibitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">229.5 Registrations for Category I and II fisheries. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">229.6 Issuance of Exemption Certificates. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">229.7 Requirements for Category III fisheries. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">229.8 Emergency and special regulations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">229.9 Penalties. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">229.10 Confidential fisheries data. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart B_Emergency and Special Regulations [Reserved] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 16 U.S.C. 1361<T3> et seq.</T3>, unless otherwise noted.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note to Part 229: </T4><T3>Effective Date:</T3> In this Part 229, andSection;andSection; 229.5 and229.6 become effective on May 19, 1989, and all other sections become effectiveon July 21, 1989. This part 229 expires on October 1, 1993. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General Provisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 229.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Purpose and scope. </ITAG>(a) The regulations in this part implement section 114 of the Marine MammalProtection Act of 1972, as amended, 16 U.S.C. 1384, Pub. L. 100-711, whichprovides for a five-year exemption from the Act's prohibition on the takingof marine mammals incidental to certain commercial fishing operations.(b) The provisions of section 114 of the Marine Mammal Protection Act of1972, rather than sections 101, 103 and 104, will govern the incidentaltaking of marine mammals in the course of commercial fishing operationsby persons using vessels of the United States, other than vessels usedin the eastern tropical Pacific tuna purse seine fishery, and vessels whichhave valid fishing permits issued in accordance with section 204(b) ofthe Magnuson Fishery Conservation and Management Act (16 U.S.C. 1824(b))for the period from November 23, 1988, through October 1, 1993. Therefore,the regulations in this part supersede until October 1, 1993, the otherprovisions for granting incidental take authority to these commercial fishermen,including regulations at 50 CFR 216.24 and guidelines on the taking ofsmall numbers of marine mammals incidental to commercial fishing operationspublished December 13, 1983 (48 FR 55493). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 229.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Definitions. </ITAG>In addition to the definitions contained in the Act and unless the contextotherwise requires, in this Part 229: (a) ``Act'' means the Marine Mammal Protection Act of 1972, as amended(16 U.S.C. 1361<T3> et seq.</T3>). (b)``Assistant Administrator'' means the Assistant Administrator for Fisheries,National Marine Fisheries Service, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration,or authorized representative. (c) ``Category I fishery'' means a commercial fishery determined by theAssistant Administrator to have a frequent incidental taking of marinemammals and identified as such in the List of Fisheries.(d) ``Category II fishery'' means a commercial fishery determined by theAssistant Administrator to have an occasional incidental taking of marinemammals and identified as such in the List of Fisheries. (e) ``Category III fishery'' means a commercial fishery determined by theAssistant Administrator to have a remote likelihood of, or no known incidentaltaking of, marine mammals and identified as such in the List of Fisheries.Eligible commercial fisheries not specifically identified as Category Ior II fisheries are deemed to be Category III fisheries. (f) ``Certificate'' or ``Exemption Certificate'' means a document issuedby the Assistant Administrator under the authority of section 114 of theAct that authorizes the incidental taking of marine mammals and that specifiesthe terms and conditions of the authorized incidental taking, includingany document that modifies the Exemption Certificate. (g) ``Commercial fishing operation'' means the catching, taking or harvestingof fish from the marine environment (or other areas where marine mammalsoccur) as part of an ongoing for-profit business enterprise. The term includeslicensed commercial passenger fishing vessel (as defined in 50 CFR 216.3)activities. (h) ``Depleted species'' means any species or population which has beendetermined to be depleted under the Act and is listed in 50 CFR 216.15or 50 CFR Part 18, Subpart E or any endangered or threatened species ofmarine mammal. (i) ``Endangered or threatened species'' means any species, subspeciesor population that has been listed under section 4 of the Endangered SpeciesAct of 1973. A list of endangered and threatened species is found in 50CFR 17.11-17.12. (j) ``Fishing vessel'' or ``vessel'' means any vessel, boat, ship, or othercraft which is used for, equipped to be used for, or of a type which isnormally used for (1) fishing, or (2) aiding or assisting one or more vesselsat sea in the performance of any activity relating to fishing, including,but not limited to, preparation, supply, storage, refrigeration, transportation,or processing. Fishing vessel or vessel refers only to vessels of the UnitedStates, other than vessels used in the eastern tropical Pacific yellowfintuna purse seine fishery, and vessels which have valid fishing permitsissued in accordance with section 204(b) of the Magnuson Fishery Conservationand Management Act. (k) ``Incidental take'' means the accidental or intentional taking of amarine mammal in the course of commercial fishing operations. (l) ``List of Fisheries'' means the most recent final list of commercialfisheries published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>by the Assistant Administrator, categorized accordingto the frequency of incidental taking of marine mammals, in accordancewith the criteria in andSection; 229.3. (m) ``Marine mammal'' means any mammal which (1) is morphologically adaptedto the marine environment, including sea otters and members of the orders<T3>Cetacea</T3> (whales and dolphins), <T3>Sirenia</T3> (dugongs and manatees) and suborder <T3>Pinnipedia</T3> (seals, sea lions and walrus), or (2) primarily inhabitsthe marine environment (such as the polar bear). (n) ``Non-vessel fishery'' means a commercial fishing operation that usesfixed or other gear without a vessel, such as gear used in set gillnet,trap, beach seine, weir, ranch and pen fisheries. (o) ``Observer'' means a qualified individual designated by the NationalMarine Fisheries Service to record the incidence of marine mammal interactionand other scientific data during commercial fishing activities. (p) ``Vessel owner'' means the owner of (1) a fishing vessel which is engagedin a commercial fishing operation, or (2) fixed or other commercial fishinggear that is used in a non-vessel fishery. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 229.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Criteria for categorizing fisheries. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Publication. </T3>(1) The Assistant Administrator will publish in the<T4>Federal Register </T4>notice of a proposed revised List of Fisherieson or about July 1, 1990, 1991 and 1992, for the purpose of receiving publiccomment. On or about October 1, 1990, 1991, and 1992, the Assistant Administratorwill publish a final revised List of Fisheries which will become effectiveJanuary 1 of the next calendar year. (2) The proposed and final revised List of Fisheries will (i) Categorizeeach commercial fishery according to the criteria set forth in paragraph(b) of this section, and (ii) List the marine mammals and the estimatednumber of vessels or persons involved in each commercial fishery. (3) The Assistant Administrator may publish a revised List of Fisheriesat other times, after notice and opportunity for public comment. The revisedfinal List of Fisheries will become effective no sooner than 30 days afterpublication in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4> (b) <T3>Categories. </T3>The List of Fisheries will be revised and commercialfisheries will be categorized into Category I, Category II or CategoryIII according to the following criteria. In evaluating incidental takesfor purposes of categorizing fisheries, the Assistant Administrator willconsider the definition of take in section 3 of the Act, the language ofsection 114 of the Act and the legislative history of the 1988 amendments.(1) <T3>Category I. </T3>(i) There is documented information indicating a ``frequent''incidental taking of marine mammals in the fishery, or (ii) Congress intendedthat the fishery should be placed in Category I and there is no documentedinformation indicating that it should be placed in another Category. ``Frequent''means that it is highly likely that more than one marine mammal will beincidentally taken by a randomly selected vessel in the fishery duringa 20-day period. (2) <T3>Category II. </T3>(i) There is documented information indicating an``occasional'' incidental taking of marine mammals in the fishery, or (ii)In the absence of information indicating the frequency of incidental takingof marine mammals, other factors such as fishing techniques, gear used,methods used to deter marine mammals, target species, seasons and areasfished, and species and distribution of marine mammals in the area suggestthere is a likelihood of at least an ``occasional'' incidental taking inthe fishery. ``Occasional'' means that there is some likelihood that onemarine mammal will be incidentally taken by a randomly selected vesselin the fishery during a 20-day period, but that there is little likelihoodthat more than one marine mammal will be incidentally taken.(3) <T3>Category III. </T3>(i) There is information indicating no more thana ``remote likelihood'' of an incidental taking of a marine mammal in thefishery, (ii) In the absence of information indicating the frequency ofincidental taking of marine mammals, other factors such as fishing techniques,gear used, methods used to deter marine mammals, target species, seasonsand areas fished, and species and distribution of marine mammals in thearea suggest there is no more than a remote likelihood of an incidentaltake in the fishery, or (iii) Congress intended that the fishery shouldbe placed in Category III and there is not documented information indicatingthat it should be placed in another Category. ``Remote likelihood'' meansthat it is highly unlikely that any marine mammal will be incidentallytaken by a randomly selected vessel in the fishery during a 20-day period.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 229.4 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prohibitions. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Prohibited activities. </T3>(1) It is unlawful for a commercial fishingvessel, a vessel owner, or a master or operator of a vessel to engage ina Category I or II fishery unless the vessel owner or authorized representativehas complied with the requirements pertaining to registration, ExemptionCertificates, decals and reports as contained in this 50 CFR Part 229.(2) It is unlawful to assault, harm, oppose, impede, intimidate, impairor in any way interfere with an observer or the observations being carriedout. (b) <T3>Prohibited taking. </T3>(1) Except as otherwise provided in 50 CFRPart 17, Part 216 or this Part 229, it is unlawful to take any marine mammalincidental to commercial fishing operations. (2) Under this Part 229, it is unlawful to (i) Take any southern (California)sea otter; or (ii) Intentionally lethally take any Steller sea lion, anyAlaskan sea otter, any cetacean, any depleted species (including the PribilofIsland population of North Pacific fur seal), or any endangered or threatenedmarine mammal. If the use of firearms or other means to deter marine mammalsresults in an injury or mortality of a marine mammal, the taking is presumedto be an intentional lethal taking. (3) Exemptions under this Part 229 apply only to prohibitions under theMarine Mammal Protection Act and do not apply to prohibitions under theEndangered Species Act of 1973. To be exempt from the taking prohibitionsunder the Endangered Species Act, specific authority under that Act isrequired. (c) <T3>Other prohibitions. </T3>It is unlawful to violate any other provisionof these regulations or the terms and conditions of Exemption Certificates.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 229.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Registrations for Category I and II fisheries. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Registrations. </T3>To engage lawfully in a Category I or II fisheryafter July 21, 1989, the vessel owner or authorized representative of thevessel owner must register for and receive an Exemption Certificate orannual renewal. Registrations should be submitted at least 30 days priorto the vessel engaging in a Category I or II fishery. The following informationis required to register: (1) Name, address, and phone number of vessel owner; (2) Name and address of operator, if different from owner; (3) Vessel name, length and home port; State commercial vessel licensenumber, Coast Guard documentation number, State registration number, and/orTribal plaque number, where appropriate; (4) A list of all Category I and II fisheries that the vessel is expectedto participate in during the calendar year (or during 1989 and 1990, ifthe registration is made during 1989), and the estimated number of tripsfrom port for each fishery; and (5) A certification, signed and dated by the vessel owner or authorizedrepresentative, as follows: ``I hereby certify under penalty of perjurythat I am the owner of the vessel or that I am authorized to register forthis exemption on behalf of the owner, that I have reviewed all informationcontained on this document, and that it is true and complete to the bestof my knowledge.'' (b) <T3>Fee. </T3>A check or money order made payable to NOAA, National MarineFisheries Service, in the amount of $30.00 must accompany each registrationor renewal. For good cause, the Assistant Administrator may waive the feerequirement. (c) <T3>Address. </T3>Registrations and requests for registration forms shouldbe sent to the Director, Office of Protected Resources, National MarineFisheries Service, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, 1335East West Highway, Silver Spring, MD 20910 (phone 301/427-2319), or oneof the following Regional Offices: (1) Director, Alaska Region, National Marine Fisheries Service, P.O. Box21668, 709 West 9th Street, Juneau, AK 99802 (907/586-7233); (2) Director, Northwest Region, National Marine Fisheries Service, 7600Sand Point Way NE., Seattle, WA 98115-0070 (206/526-6110); (3) Director, Southwest Region, National Marine Fisheries Service, 300S. Ferry Street, Terminal Island, CA 90731-7415 (213/514-6664);(4) Director, Northeast Region, National Marine Fisheries Service, 1 BlackburnDrive, Gloucester, MA 01930 (508/281-9328); or (5) Director, Southeast Region, National Marine Fisheries Service, 9450Koger Blvd., St. Petersburg, FL 33702 (813/893-3366). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 229.6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Issuance of Exemption Certificates. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Criteria.</T3> After receipt of a completed initial registration andrequired fee, an Exemption Certificate and decal will be issued to thevessel owner. If the Certificate and decal are issued in 1989, a 1990 annualsticker for the decal will be automatically issued upon receipt of requiredreport(s) for 1989. The Exemption Certificate will be renewed and an annualsticker issued after receipt of an updated registration, required fee andrequired report(s) covering all registered Category I and II fisheries.An interim report should be submitted with the renewal request if fishingunder the current Exemption Certificate will not be completed by December31. (b) <T3>Possession of Certificates and decals.</T3> (1) The decal and, after1989, a current annual sticker must be attached to the vessel port sideon the cabin or, in the absence of a cabin, port side forward on the hull,and must be free of obstruction and in good condition. A decal is not requiredfor non-vessel fisheries. (2) The Exemption Certificate or valid copy must be on board the vesselwhile it is operating in a Category I or II fishery, or, in the case ofnon-vessel fisheries, the Certificate or valid copy must be in the possessionof the person in charge of the fishing operation. The Certificate or validcopy must be made available upon request to any State or Federal enforcementagent authorized to enforce the Act or to any designated agent of the NationalMarine Fisheries Service. (c) <T3>Terms and conditions.</T3> (1) Certificates will expire at the endof the calendar year, except that Certificates issued in 1989 will expireat the end of 1990. After 1989, a current annual sticker is required fora decal to be valid. (2) Reports. [Reserved] (3) Observer requirements. (i) If requested by the National Marine FisheriesService, a Certificate holder engaged in a Category I fishery must takeon board an observer to accompany the vessel on any or all fishing tripsin a fishing season. (ii) After being notified by the National Marine Fisheries Service thatthe vessel is required to carry an observer, the Certificate holder mustcomply with the notification by providing the specified information withinthe specified time on scheduled or anticipated fishing trips to facilitateobserver placement. (iii) The National Marine Fisheries Service may waive the observer requirementbased on a finding that the facilities for housing the observer or forcarrying out observer functions are so inadequate or unsafe that the healthor safety of the observer or the safe operation of the vessel would bejeopardized. (iv) The Certificate holder, master and crew must cooperate with the observerin the performance of the observer's duties including: (A) Providing adequate accommodations; (B) Allowing for the embarking and debarking of the observer as specifiedby the National Marine Fisheries Service. The operator of a vessel mustensure that transfers of observers at sea are accomplished in a safe manner,via small boat or raft, during daylight hours as weather and sea conditionsallow, and with the agreement of the observer involved; (C) Allowing the observer access to all areas of the vessel necessary toconduct observer duties; (D) Allowing the observer access to communications equipment and navigationequipment as necessary to perform observer duties; (E) Providing true vessel locations by latitude and longitude or lorancoordinates, upon request by the observer; (F) Providing marine mammal specimens, as requested; (G) Notifying the observer in a timely fashion of when commercial fishingoperations are to begin and end; and (H) Complying with other guidelines, regulations or conditions in Certificatesthat the National Marine Fisheries Service may develop to ensure the effectivedeployment and use of observers. (v) Marine mammals killed during fishing operations which are readily accessibleto crew members must be brought aboard the vessel for biological processing,if feasible and if requested by the observer. Marine mammals designatedas biological specimens by the observer must be retained in cold storageaboard the vessel, if feasible, until retrieved by authorized personnelof the National Marine Fisheries Service. (vi) Observers may not bring a civil action against the vessel or vesselowner under any law of the United States for any illness, disability, injuryor death from service as an observer, except in cases of the vessel owner'swillful misconduct or if the observer is engaged by the owner, master orindividual in charge of a vessel to perform any duties in service to thevessel.(vii) The National Marine Fisheries Service will provide for the paymentof all reasonable costs directly related to housing and maintaining observerson board vessels and related to maintaining biological specimens as requestedby the observer or required in Exemption Certificates. (4) Any marine mammal incidentally taken must be immediately returned tothe sea with a minimum of further injury and may be retained only if authorizedby an observer, by a condition of the Exemption Certificate, or by a scientificresearch permit that is in the possession of the operator. (5) A Certificate holder or a crew member may intentionally take marinemammals to protect catch, gear or person during the course of the commercialfishing operation by a means and in a manner not expected to cause deathor injury to a marine mammal. (6) If the infliction of the damage to catch, gear or person is substantialand immediate and only after all non-injurious means authorized by paragraph(c)(5) of this section have been taken, a Certificate holder or crew membermay intentionally injure or kill a marine mammal to protect gear, catchor person; except that it is prohibited for a Certificate holder or crewmember to intentionally lethally take any Steller sea lion, any Alaskansea otter, any cetacean, any depleted species (including the Pribilof Islandpopulation of North Pacific fur seal), or any endangered or threatenedmarine mammal. (7) No fishing gear, in whole or in part, may be willfully discarded. (8) A Certificate holder must notify the Assistant Administrator in writing:(i) If the vessel will engage in any Category I or II fishery not listedon the registration at least 30 days prior to engaging in that fishery,and (ii) of any changes in mailing address or vessel ownership within 30days of such change. (9) Certificates and decals are not transferable. In the event of the saleor change in ownership of the vessel, the Certificate is void and the newowner must register for an Exemption Certificate and decal. (10) The Assistant Administrator may establish other terms and conditionson Exemption Certificates, including terms and conditions for specificfisheries necessary to minimize adverse impacts to a marine mammal populationin accordance with the procedures in andSection; 229.8(b) or to comply withthe Endangered Species Act of 1973. (d) <T3>Suspension, revocation or denial of Certificates. </T3>(1) The AssistantAdministrator may suspend or revoke an Exemption Certificate or deny aCertificate renewal in accordance with the provisions in 15 CFR Part 904if the Certificate holder: (i) Fails to submit reports as required; (ii) Fails to take on board an observer in a Category I fishery, if requestedby the National Marine Fisheries Service; or (iii) Fails to comply with other terms and conditions, including specialconditions, of the Exemption Certificate or with these regulations;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Except that the suspension, revocation or denial specified in paragraph(d)(1)(i) of this section may be without prior notice or opportunity forhearing. (2) A suspended Certificate may be reinstated at any time at the discretionof the Assistant Administrator. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 229.7 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for Category III fisheries. </ITAG>(a) Vessel owners engaged only in Category III fisheries are not requiredto register for or receive an Exemption Certificate. Vessel owners andcrew members of such vessels may incidentally take marine mammals subjectto these provisions. (b) [Reserved] (c) Any marine mammal incidentally taken must be immediately returned tothe sea with a minimum of further injury and may be retained only if authorizedby an observer, by the Assistant Administrator, or by a scientific researchpermit that is in the possession of the operator.(d) Vessel owners and crew members may intentionally take marine mammalsto protect catch, gear or person during the course of commercial fishingoperations, by a means and in a manner not expected to cause death or injuryto a marine mammal. (e) If the infliction of the damage to gear, catch or person is substantialand immediate and only after all non-injurious methods authorized by paragraph(d) of this section have been taken, a vessel owner or crew member mayintentionally injure or kill a marine mammal to protect gear, catch orperson; except that it is prohibited for a vessel owner or crew memberto intentionally lethally take any Steller sea lion, any Alaskan sea otter,any cetacean, any depleted species (including the Pribilof Island populationof North Pacific fur seal), or any endangered or threatened marine mammal.(f) The willful discard of any fishing gear, in whole or in part, is prohibited.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 229.8</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Emergency and special regulations. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Emergency regulations. </T3>If the Assistant Administrator finds thatthe incidental taking of marine mammals in a fishery is having an immediateand significant adverse impact on a marine mammal population, or in thecase of Steller sea lions and North Pacific fur seals, that more than 1,350and 50, respectively, will be incidentally killed during a calendar yearin all fisheries combined, the Assistant Administrator will issue emergencyregulations to prevent, to the maximum extent practicable, any furthertaking. Any such regulations (1) Will be issued only after consultation with Regional Fishery ManagementCouncils, State fishery agencies and treaty Indian tribal governments,where appropriate, and will, to the maximum extent practicable, avoid interferingwith existing Regional, State or tribal fishery management plans; (2) Will take into account the economics of the fishery and the availabilityof existing technology to minimize incidental taking to the extent thatelimination of the adverse effects on the marine mammal population willallow; (3) May take effect immediately upon publication in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>and will remain in effect for no more than 180days or until the end of the fishing season, whichever is earlier; and(4) Will be terminated by notice in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>at an earlier date if the Assistant Administratordetermines that the reasons for the emergency regulations no longer exist.(b) <T3>Special regulations or conditions. </T3>(1) If the Assistant Administratorfinds that the incidental taking of marine mammals in a fishery is nothaving an immediate and significant adverse impact on a marine mammal population,but that it will likely have a significant adverse impact over a periodof time longer than one year, the Assistant Administrator will requestRegional Fishery Management Councils, State fisheries agencies or treatyIndian tribal governments, where appropriate, to initiate or take actionto minimize such impact. (2) If the Councils, States or tribes do not take appropriate action ina reasonable period of time, the Assistant Administrator will issue specialregulations or impose special conditions on Exemption Certificates to mitigatethe adverse impacts. (3) Any such regulations or conditions will be issued only if, after noticeand opportunity for public comment, the Assistant Administrator determinessuch action is necessary to further the purposes of section 114 of theMMPA. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 229.9</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Penalties. </ITAG>(a) Except as otherwise provided, all violations of these regulations aresubject to NOAA's civil procedures contained in 15 CFR Part 904. (b) Notwithstanding any other provision in these or other NOAA regulations,a person or vessel will not be subject to penalties for unknowing violationsbased on failure to register occurring before January 1, 1990. An unknowingviolation is one where the violator can establish that he or she has notreceived actual prior notice of the registration requirements and has nothad the opportunity to receive actual notice. Actual notice is presumedwhere a person has received a MMPA Exemption Registration form or any otherpublication published by National Marine Fisheries Service for the purposeof informing the public of the registration requirements contained in theseregulations. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 229.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Confidential fisheries data. </ITAG>(a) Proprietary or confidential information includes information, the unauthorizeddisclosure of which could be prejudicial or harmful, such as informationor data that are identifiable with an individual fisherman. Proprietaryor confidential information obtained under this Part 229 must not be disclosedexcept (1) To Federal employees whose duties require access to such information;(2) To State employees under an agreement with the Assistant Administratorthat prevents public disclosure of the identity or business of any person;(3) When required by court order; or (4) In the case of scientific information involving fisheries, to employeesof Regional Fishery Management Councils who are responsible for fisherymanagement plan development and monitoring. (b) Information will be made public in aggregate, summary, or other suchform that does not disclose the identity or business of any person in accordancewith NOAA Directive 88-30. Aggregate or summary form means data or informationsubmitted by three or more persons that have been summed or assembled insuch a way that the summation or assembly does not reveal the identityor business of any person.<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart B_Emergency and Special Regulations [Reserved] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 611_FOREIGN FISHING </ITAG>6. The authority citation for 50 CFR Part 611 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>16 U.S.C. 1801 <T3>et seq., </T3>16 U.S.C. 971 <T3>et seq.,</T3> 22 U.S.C. 1971 <T3>et seq., </T3>and 16 U.S.C. 1361 <T3>et seq.</T3></ITAG>7. Section 611.1 is amended by revising paragraph (c) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 611.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and scope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) Other U.S. laws and regulations apply to foreign vessels fishing inthe U.S. EEZ such as the Marine Mammal Protection Act of 1972 (16 U.S.C.1361 <T3>et seq. </T3>and 50 CFR Parts 216 and 229). 8. Section 611.3 is amended by revising paragraph (a)(3) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 611.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Vessel permits. </ITAG>(a) * * * (3) Permits issued under this section do not authorize FFV's or personsto harass, capture, or kill marine mammals. No marine mammals may be takenin the course of fishing unless that vessel has on board a currently validcertificate of inclusion issued under a general permit or an ExemptionCertificate, as appropriate, under the Marine Mammal Protection Act. Regulationsgoverning the taking of marine mammals incidental to commercial fishingoperations are contained in 50 CFR 216.24 and 229. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Date: May 12, 1989.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">James W. Brennan, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Administrator for Fisheries, National Oceanic and AtmosphericAdministration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-11877 Filed 5-18-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 3510-22-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>